dictionaries/isv_lat_hunspell_dict.aff
SET UTF-8

TRY -ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZčČžŽěĚšŠabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz

BREAK 1
BREAK =

NOSPLITSUGS

WORDCHARS -

FLAG long

COMPOUNDBEGIN xB
COMPOUNDEND xE
COMPOUNDPERMITFLAG xP
ONLYINCOMPOUND xO

MAP 13
MAP ćčc
MAP ęeěėèé
MAP ųu
MAP åa
MAP oȯòó
MAP đ(dž)
MAP ľlłĺ
MAP nňń
MAP rŕř
MAP tť
MAP dď
MAP sś
MAP źz

REP 38
REP e ě
REP e y
REP i y
REP y i
REP e je
REP y e
REP l lj
REP s ss
REP ě e
REP ljenje jenje
REP tuty tutoj
REP j ju
REP og ogo
REP v u
REP ě je
REP je ě
REP y j
REP jedny jedin
REP oro ra
REP olo la
REP sistemom sistemoju
REP gleda gledě
REP gleda gledi
REP krov krv
REP česky čsky
REP gde kde
REP nemečesk němečsk
REP daby da_by
REP lej ljev
REP sa _se
REP sja _se
REP nedolgo ne_dolgo
REP ii iji
REP sofii zofiji
REP svjat svet
REP ogo ojego
REP stč šč
REP št šč

PFX zz Y 1
PFX zz 0 naj .

SFX AA Y 80
SFX AA ti l .
SFX AA ti la .
SFX AA ti lo .
SFX AA ti li .
SFX AA sati šu .
SFX AA sati šem .
SFX AA sati šeš .
SFX AA sati še .
SFX AA sati šemo .
SFX AA sati šete .
SFX AA sati šut .
SFX AA ti h .
SFX AA ti še .
SFX AA ti hmo .
SFX AA ti ste .
SFX AA ti hu .
SFX AA sati ši .
SFX AA sati šimo .
SFX AA sati šite .
SFX AA sati šuči .
SFX AA sati šučego .
SFX AA sati šučemu .
SFX AA sati šučim .
SFX AA sati šučem .
SFX AA sati šučih .
SFX AA sati šučimi .
SFX AA sati šuča .
SFX AA sati šuču .
SFX AA sati šučej .
SFX AA sati šučeju .
SFX AA sati šuče .
SFX AA sati šemy .
SFX AA sati šemogo .
SFX AA sati šemomu .
SFX AA sati šemym .
SFX AA sati šemom .
SFX AA sati šemo .
SFX AA sati šema .
SFX AA sati šemu .
SFX AA sati šemoj .
SFX AA sati šemoju .
SFX AA sati šemi .
SFX AA sati šeme .
SFX AA sati šemyh .
SFX AA sati šemym .
SFX AA sati šemymi .
SFX AA ti vši .
SFX AA ti všego .
SFX AA ti všemu .
SFX AA ti všim .
SFX AA ti všem .
SFX AA ti vših .
SFX AA ti všimi .
SFX AA ti vša .
SFX AA ti všu .
SFX AA ti všej .
SFX AA ti všeju .
SFX AA ti vše .
SFX AA ti ny .
SFX AA ti nogo .
SFX AA ti nomu .
SFX AA ti nym .
SFX AA ti nom .
SFX AA ti ni .
SFX AA ti ne .
SFX AA ti nyh .
SFX AA ti nymi .
SFX AA ti na .
SFX AA ti nu .
SFX AA ti noj .
SFX AA ti noju .
SFX AA ti no .
SFX AA ti nje/xPxE .
SFX AA ti nja/xPxE .
SFX AA ti nju/xPxE .
SFX AA ti njem/xPxE .
SFX AA ti nij/xPxE .
SFX AA ti njam/xPxE .
SFX AA ti njami/xPxE .
SFX AA ti njah/xPxE .

SFX AB Y 11
SFX AB 0 0/xPxE .
SFX AB a o/xPxBxO .
SFX AB a y/xPxE .
SFX AB a u/xPxE .
SFX AB a 0 .
SFX AB a ě/xPxE .
SFX AB 0 h/xPxE .
SFX AB 0 m/xPxE .
SFX AB a oju/xPxE .
SFX AB 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX AB a o/xPxE .

SFX AC Y 4
SFX AC to ogo .
SFX AC to om .
SFX AC to omu .
SFX AC to ym .

SFX AD Y 28
SFX AD 0 0/xPxE .
SFX AD y o/xBxPxE .
SFX AD y a/xPxE .
SFX AD y ogo/xPxE .
SFX AD y u/xPxE .
SFX AD y oj/xPxE .
SFX AD y om/xPxE .
SFX AD y omu/xPxE .
SFX AD 0 m/xPxE .
SFX AD y oju/xPxE .
SFX AD y i/xPxE .
SFX AD y e/xPxE .
SFX AD 0 h/xPxE .
SFX AD 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX AD ky ši/zz .
SFX AD ky šego/zz .
SFX AD ky šemu/zz .
SFX AD ky šim/zz .
SFX AD ky šem/zz .
SFX AD ky še/zz .
SFX AD ky ša/zz .
SFX AD ky šu/zz .
SFX AD ky šej/zz .
SFX AD ky šeju/zz .
SFX AD ky ših/zz .
SFX AD ky šim/zz .
SFX AD ky šimi/zz .
SFX AD ky je/zz .

SFX AE Y 28
SFX AE 0 0/xPxE .
SFX AE y o/xBxPxE .
SFX AE y a/xPxE .
SFX AE y ogo/xPxE .
SFX AE y u/xPxE .
SFX AE y oj/xPxE .
SFX AE y om/xPxE .
SFX AE y omu/xPxE .
SFX AE 0 m/xPxE .
SFX AE y oju/xPxE .
SFX AE y i/xPxE .
SFX AE y e/xPxE .
SFX AE 0 h/xPxE .
SFX AE 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX AE liky čši/zz .
SFX AE liky čšego/zz .
SFX AE liky čšemu/zz .
SFX AE liky čšim/zz .
SFX AE liky čšem/zz .
SFX AE liky čše/zz .
SFX AE liky čša/zz .
SFX AE liky čšu/zz .
SFX AE liky čšej/zz .
SFX AE liky čšeju/zz .
SFX AE liky čših/zz .
SFX AE liky čšim/zz .
SFX AE liky čšimi/zz .
SFX AE liky če/xPxE .

SFX AF Y 99
SFX AF ti l .
SFX AF ti la .
SFX AF ti lo .
SFX AF ti li .
SFX AF ti ju .
SFX AF ti m .
SFX AF ti ješ .
SFX AF ti š .
SFX AF ti je .
SFX AF ti 0 .
SFX AF ti jemo .
SFX AF ti mo .
SFX AF ti jete .
SFX AF i e .
SFX AF ti jut .
SFX AF ti h .
SFX AF ti še .
SFX AF ti hmo .
SFX AF ti ste .
SFX AF ti hu .
SFX AF ti j .
SFX AF ti jmo .
SFX AF ti jte .
SFX AF ti juči .
SFX AF ti jučego .
SFX AF ti jučemu .
SFX AF ti jučim .
SFX AF ti jučem .
SFX AF ti jučih .
SFX AF ti jučimi .
SFX AF ti juča .
SFX AF ti juču .
SFX AF ti jučej .
SFX AF ti jučeju .
SFX AF ti juče .
SFX AF ti jemy .
SFX AF ti jemogo .
SFX AF ti jemomu .
SFX AF ti jemym .
SFX AF ti jemom .
SFX AF ti jemo .
SFX AF ti jema .
SFX AF ti jemu .
SFX AF ti jemoj .
SFX AF ti jemoju .
SFX AF ti jemi .
SFX AF ti jeme .
SFX AF ti jemyh .
SFX AF ti jemym .
SFX AF ti jemymi .
SFX AF ti my .
SFX AF ti mogo .
SFX AF ti momu .
SFX AF ti mym .
SFX AF ti mom .
SFX AF ti mo .
SFX AF ti ma .
SFX AF ti mu .
SFX AF ti moj .
SFX AF ti moju .
SFX AF ti mi .
SFX AF ti me .
SFX AF ti myh .
SFX AF ti mym .
SFX AF ti mymi .
SFX AF ti vši .
SFX AF ti všego .
SFX AF ti všemu .
SFX AF ti všim .
SFX AF ti všem .
SFX AF ti vših .
SFX AF ti všimi .
SFX AF ti vša .
SFX AF ti všu .
SFX AF ti všej .
SFX AF ti všeju .
SFX AF ti vše .
SFX AF ti ny .
SFX AF ti nogo .
SFX AF ti nomu .
SFX AF ti nym .
SFX AF ti nom .
SFX AF ti ni .
SFX AF ti ne .
SFX AF ti nyh .
SFX AF ti nymi .
SFX AF ti na .
SFX AF ti nu .
SFX AF ti noj .
SFX AF ti noju .
SFX AF ti no .
SFX AF ti nje/xPxE .
SFX AF ti nja/xPxE .
SFX AF ti nju/xPxE .
SFX AF ti njem/xPxE .
SFX AF ti nij/xPxE .
SFX AF ti njam/xPxE .
SFX AF ti njami/xPxE .
SFX AF ti njah/xPxE .

SFX AG Y 5
SFX AG 0 0/xPxE .
SFX AG o o/xPxBxO .
SFX AG o a/xPxE .
SFX AG o u/xPxE .
SFX AG 0 m/xPxE .

SFX AH Y 80
SFX AH ti l .
SFX AH ti la .
SFX AH ti lo .
SFX AH ti li .
SFX AH ovati uju .
SFX AH ovati ujem .
SFX AH ovati uješ .
SFX AH ovati uje .
SFX AH ovati ujemo .
SFX AH ovati ujete .
SFX AH ovati ujut .
SFX AH ti h .
SFX AH ti še .
SFX AH ti hmo .
SFX AH ti ste .
SFX AH ti hu .
SFX AH ovati uj .
SFX AH ovati ujmo .
SFX AH ovati ujte .
SFX AH ovati ujuči .
SFX AH ovati ujučego .
SFX AH ovati ujučemu .
SFX AH ovati ujučim .
SFX AH ovati ujučem .
SFX AH ovati ujučih .
SFX AH ovati ujučimi .
SFX AH ovati ujuča .
SFX AH ovati ujuču .
SFX AH ovati ujučej .
SFX AH ovati ujučeju .
SFX AH ovati ujuče .
SFX AH ovati ujemy .
SFX AH ovati ujemogo .
SFX AH ovati ujemomu .
SFX AH ovati ujemym .
SFX AH ovati ujemom .
SFX AH ovati ujemo .
SFX AH ovati ujema .
SFX AH ovati ujemu .
SFX AH ovati ujemoj .
SFX AH ovati ujemoju .
SFX AH ovati ujemi .
SFX AH ovati ujeme .
SFX AH ovati ujemyh .
SFX AH ovati ujemym .
SFX AH ovati ujemymi .
SFX AH ti vši .
SFX AH ti všego .
SFX AH ti všemu .
SFX AH ti všim .
SFX AH ti všem .
SFX AH ti vših .
SFX AH ti všimi .
SFX AH ti vša .
SFX AH ti všu .
SFX AH ti všej .
SFX AH ti všeju .
SFX AH ti vše .
SFX AH ti ny .
SFX AH ti nogo .
SFX AH ti nomu .
SFX AH ti nym .
SFX AH ti nom .
SFX AH ti ni .
SFX AH ti ne .
SFX AH ti nyh .
SFX AH ti nymi .
SFX AH ti na .
SFX AH ti nu .
SFX AH ti noj .
SFX AH ti noju .
SFX AH ti no .
SFX AH ti nje/xPxE .
SFX AH ti nja/xPxE .
SFX AH ti nju/xPxE .
SFX AH ti njem/xPxE .
SFX AH ti nij/xPxE .
SFX AH ti njam/xPxE .
SFX AH ti njami/xPxE .
SFX AH ti njah/xPxE .

SFX AI Y 68
SFX AI ti l .
SFX AI ti la .
SFX AI ti lo .
SFX AI ti li .
SFX AI iti ju .
SFX AI ti m .
SFX AI ti š .
SFX AI ti 0 .
SFX AI ti mo .
SFX AI i e .
SFX AI iti et .
SFX AI ti h .
SFX AI ti še .
SFX AI ti hmo .
SFX AI ti ste .
SFX AI ti hu .
SFX AI iti eči .
SFX AI iti eča .
SFX AI iti eče .
SFX AI ti my .
SFX AI ti mogo .
SFX AI ti momu .
SFX AI ti mym .
SFX AI ti mom .
SFX AI ti mo .
SFX AI ti ma .
SFX AI ti mu .
SFX AI ti moj .
SFX AI ti moju .
SFX AI ti mi .
SFX AI ti me .
SFX AI ti myh .
SFX AI ti mym .
SFX AI ti mymi .
SFX AI ti vši .
SFX AI ti všego .
SFX AI ti všemu .
SFX AI ti všim .
SFX AI ti všem .
SFX AI ti vših .
SFX AI ti všimi .
SFX AI ti vša .
SFX AI ti všu .
SFX AI ti všej .
SFX AI ti všeju .
SFX AI ti vše .
SFX AI iti jeny .
SFX AI iti jenogo .
SFX AI iti jenomu .
SFX AI iti jenym .
SFX AI iti jenom .
SFX AI iti jeni .
SFX AI iti jene .
SFX AI iti jenyh .
SFX AI iti jenymi .
SFX AI iti jena .
SFX AI iti jenu .
SFX AI iti jenoj .
SFX AI iti jenoju .
SFX AI iti jeno .
SFX AI iti jenje/xPxE .
SFX AI iti jenja/xPxE .
SFX AI iti jenju/xPxE .
SFX AI iti jenjem/xPxE .
SFX AI iti jenij/xPxE .
SFX AI iti jenjam/xPxE .
SFX AI iti jenjami/xPxE .
SFX AI iti jenjah/xPxE .

SFX AJ Y 7
SFX AJ 0 0/xPxE .
SFX AJ a e/xPxBxO .
SFX AJ a u/xPxE .
SFX AJ a e/xPxE .
SFX AJ a i/xPxE .
SFX AJ a eju/xPxE .
SFX AJ a o/xPxE .

SFX AK Y 11
SFX AK 0 0/xPxE .
SFX AK 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX AK ok ky/xPxE .
SFX AK ok ka/xPxE .
SFX AK ok kov/xPxE .
SFX AK ok ku/xPxE .
SFX AK ok kah/xPxE .
SFX AK ok kam/xPxE .
SFX AK ok kom/xPxE .
SFX AK ok kami/xPxE .
SFX AK ok če/xPxE .

SFX AL Y 11
SFX AL 0 0/xPxE .
SFX AL a e/xPxBxO .
SFX AL a e/xPxE .
SFX AL a u/xPxE .
SFX AL a 0 .
SFX AL a i/xPxE .
SFX AL 0 h/xPxE .
SFX AL 0 m/xPxE .
SFX AL a eju/xPxE .
SFX AL 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX AL a o/xPxE .

SFX AM Y 9
SFX AM 0 0/xPxE .
SFX AM e e/xPxBxO .
SFX AM e a/xPxE .
SFX AM je ij/xPxE .
SFX AM e u/xPxE .
SFX AM e ah/xPxE .
SFX AM e am/xPxE .
SFX AM 0 m/xPxE .
SFX AM e ami/xPxE .

SFX AN Y 62
SFX AN ti l .
SFX AN ti la .
SFX AN ti lo .
SFX AN ti li .
SFX AN ti vu .
SFX AN ti vem .
SFX AN ti veš .
SFX AN ti ve .
SFX AN ti vemo .
SFX AN ti vete .
SFX AN ti vut .
SFX AN ti h .
SFX AN ti še .
SFX AN ti hmo .
SFX AN ti ste .
SFX AN ti hu .
SFX AN ti vi .
SFX AN ti vimo .
SFX AN ti vite .
SFX AN ti vuči .
SFX AN ti vučego .
SFX AN ti vučemu .
SFX AN ti vučim .
SFX AN ti vučem .
SFX AN ti vučih .
SFX AN ti vučimi .
SFX AN ti vuča .
SFX AN ti vuču .
SFX AN ti vučej .
SFX AN ti vučeju .
SFX AN ti vuče .
SFX AN ti vemy .
SFX AN ti vemogo .
SFX AN ti vemomu .
SFX AN ti vemym .
SFX AN ti vemom .
SFX AN ti vemo .
SFX AN ti vema .
SFX AN ti vemu .
SFX AN ti vemoj .
SFX AN ti vemoju .
SFX AN ti vemi .
SFX AN ti veme .
SFX AN ti vemyh .
SFX AN ti vemym .
SFX AN ti vemymi .
SFX AN ti vši .
SFX AN ti všego .
SFX AN ti všemu .
SFX AN ti všim .
SFX AN ti všem .
SFX AN ti vših .
SFX AN ti všimi .
SFX AN ti vša .
SFX AN ti všu .
SFX AN ti všej .
SFX AN ti všeju .
SFX AN ti vše .
SFX AN i y .
SFX AN i a .
SFX AN i o .
SFX AN i je .

SFX AO Y 28
SFX AO 0 0/xPxE .
SFX AO y o/xBxPxE .
SFX AO y a/xPxE .
SFX AO y ogo/xPxE .
SFX AO y u/xPxE .
SFX AO y oj/xPxE .
SFX AO y om/xPxE .
SFX AO y omu/xPxE .
SFX AO 0 m/xPxE .
SFX AO y oju/xPxE .
SFX AO y i/xPxE .
SFX AO y e/xPxE .
SFX AO 0 h/xPxE .
SFX AO 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX AO y ějši/zz .
SFX AO y ějšego/zz .
SFX AO y ějšemu/zz .
SFX AO y ějšim/zz .
SFX AO y ějšem/zz .
SFX AO y ějše/zz .
SFX AO y ějša/zz .
SFX AO y ějšu/zz .
SFX AO y ějšej/zz .
SFX AO y ějšeju/zz .
SFX AO y ějših/zz .
SFX AO y ějšim/zz .
SFX AO y ějšimi/zz .
SFX AO y ěje/zz .

SFX AP Y 11
SFX AP 0 0/xPxE .
SFX AP 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX AP 0 i/xPxE .
SFX AP 0 a/xPxE .
SFX AP 0 ov/xPxE .
SFX AP 0 u/xPxE .
SFX AP 0 ah/xPxE .
SFX AP 0 am/xPxE .
SFX AP 0 om/xPxE .
SFX AP 0 ami/xPxE .
SFX AP 0 e/xPxE .

SFX AQ Y 11
SFX AQ 0 0/xPxE .
SFX AQ 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX AQ 0 y/xPxE .
SFX AQ 0 a/xPxE .
SFX AQ 0 ov/xPxE .
SFX AQ 0 u/xPxE .
SFX AQ 0 ah/xPxE .
SFX AQ 0 am/xPxE .
SFX AQ 0 om/xPxE .
SFX AQ 0 ami/xPxE .
SFX AQ 0 e/xPxE .

SFX AR Y 12
SFX AR 0 0/xPxE .
SFX AR a o/xPxBxO .
SFX AR a i/xPxE .
SFX AR a u/xPxE .
SFX AR a ov/xPxE .
SFX AR a y/xPxE .
SFX AR a ě/xPxE .
SFX AR 0 h/xPxE .
SFX AR 0 m/xPxE .
SFX AR a oju/xPxE .
SFX AR 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX AR a o/xPxE .
